Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 2

Chickasaw Basin Authority

64-1-201. Authority creation — Purpose — Limitations.

There is hereby created the Chickasaw basin authority, as a public body corporate, politic and perpetual, which is referred to as the “authority” in this part.

The authority is created to implement the project as presently planned and as may be modeled by future studies.

The authority shall not exercise any broad governmental controls or police powers to regulate land use planning, zoning, subdivision regulations, building codes and similar powers to regulate land use.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 1; T.C.A., §66-1-201.

Compiler's Notes. The Chickasaw basin authority, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

64-1-202. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the various counties and cities of the state that are members of the Chickasaw basin authority and within the designated area have the most effective and efficient means of organizing themselves on a regional basis for the purpose of general and comprehensive water resources planning and development activities to provide coordinated, efficient and orderly development of the surface water management plans and projects within the area as established by the Chickasaw basin authority programs and all approved amendments thereto. Such development includes all recreational and conservation developments adjacent to any water management project. It is the intent that local governments through the authority be guided and assisted in making maximum use of coordinated federal, state and local programs designed to stimulate the development of all water and land resources within the drainage area of the Wolf and Loosahatchie Rivers and Nonconnah and Horn Lake Creeks. It is the further intent of this part that in order to ensure the success of such regional planning and development the state may provide financial assistance to the authority for such purposes as are approved by the general assembly. The Chickasaw basin authority and the counties and municipalities within the designated area are authorized to request, develop, maintain and make available to the residents of such counties and municipalities the recreational and conservation areas adjacent to any approved project within the area of the Chickasaw basin authority. The authority shall have jurisdiction over such programs related to the rivers and streams and their respective drainage areas that flow within Shelby County. In addition, the authority shall have jurisdiction over such programs related to the Wolf River and its respective drainage area without regard to county or municipal boundaries.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 2; T.C.A., §66-1-202; Acts 2008, ch. 685, § 1.

64-1-203. Board of directors — Officers — Meetings — Expenses — Quorum.

The organization of the authority is as follows:

The authority shall be governed by a board of directors;

Membership of the board of directors shall consist of:

The presiding officer of the county legislative body or the presiding officer's authorized representative and one (1) other member from the county legislative body in each county that is a member of the authority. The terms of such members shall coincide with their terms of office; but such membership may, at the discretion of the respective county legislative body, be rotated annually;

The chair or the chair's authorized representative and one (1) member of the council of the city of Memphis. The terms of such members shall coincide with their terms of office, but such membership may, at the discretion of the council, be rotated annually;

One (1) member at large, to be appointed by the governor to serve during the governor's term of office;

The mayor of Shelby County or the mayor's authorized representative;

One (1) member from each county soil conservation district board of supervisors from each county that is a member of the authority, as established under title 43, chapter 14, part 2. The term of such member shall coincide with the member's term of office on the district board, but such membership may, at the discretion of the district board, be rotated annually; and

The mayor, or the mayor's authorized representative, of each incorporated municipality within counties that are members of the authority;

No person shall be appointed to the board by any legislative body or the governor who has an interest, either indirect ownership or through a trustee, in real property that is to be acquired by the Chickasaw basin authority. Any person not eligible for appointment due to the prohibitions in this subdivision (a)(2)(B) who accepts such appointment shall be subject to the penalties set forth in §§ 12-4-101 and 12-4-102. Whenever public officials who are members of the board by virtue of office, including the presiding officer of the county legislative bodies in each county that is a member of the authority, the chair of the council of the city of Memphis, the mayor of Shelby County and the mayor of each incorporated municipality within counties that are members of the authority, are not eligible to serve as a member of the board due to this subdivision (a)(2)(B), the legislative body of the respective county or municipality shall elect an authorized representative to serve in place of the public officials; and

Upon completion of its membership, the appointees shall meet and organize at Memphis, elect a chair, vice chair and secretary-treasurer and set a regular time and place for meetings of the board. The officers of the board of directors shall be elected annually at the first meeting of each calendar year.

Directors and ex officio members shall serve without compensation, except reimbursements for actual traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, subject to such funds as may be available to the authority and with the approval of their respective elected legislative bodies. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The authority shall act only by vote or concurrence of a majority of a quorum of its membership. A quorum shall be not less than one-half (½) of the members of the authority.

Any member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year is removed as a member of the board.

The presiding officer of the board shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of the member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (d)(1).

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1 (132); 1976, ch. 847, §§ 3, 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; Acts 1980, ch. 757, § 1; T.C.A., §66-1-203; 2020, ch. 663, § 3.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 663, § 4. April 2, 2020.

64-1-204. Powers and duties.

The powers, duties and functions of the authority are as follows:

Have perpetual succession in corporate name;

Sue and be sued in corporate name;

Adopt, use and alter a corporate seal, which shall be judicially noted;

Enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with state, federal and local governments, with private individuals and corporations and with associations and organizations as the board may deem necessary or convenient to enable it to carry out the purposes of this part. This authority includes, without limitation, the power to contract and make cooperative arrangements with the adjoining state of Mississippi, including cities, counties and other public agencies within that state, for planning, land purchase and acquisition, construction, operation and maintenance of all works related to water resources, development, conservations and open space. It is the intent of this subdivision (4) that the authority have full powers to operate across state lines, subject only to contractual agreements with private, governmental and public bodies and agencies;

Adopt, amend and repeal bylaws;

Appoint such managers, officers, employees, attorneys and agents as the board deems necessary or convenient for the transaction of its business and to fix their compensation, define their duties and require bonds of such of them as the board may determine;

Accept grants, funds and other assistance from any governmental agencies, private agencies and individuals and spend these in behalf of the programs;

Investigate and study all water and related land resources of the Chickasaw basin for overall planning and development;

Adopt a comprehensive plan for development of the water, land and related land resources of the Chickasaw basin area, which will include, as a minimum, the identification of projects, works and facilities needed to protect, enhance and accelerate the orderly growth, safety, welfare and development of the area. Such plan shall take into account the plans and proposals adopted by other local, state and federal agencies dealing with water and related land resources development, conservation and control and shall be compatible with plans of the Memphis-Delta development district. Special consideration shall be given to projects and work related to the United States corps of engineers, the United States soil conservation service and the United States department of the interior;

Execute contracts with existing agencies involved in regional planning and development for providing combined staffs and operating personnel, including the Mississippi-Arkansas-Tennessee council of governments, and a development district organized under title 13, chapter 14;

Prepare preliminary architectural and engineering plans for specific projects and works of the authority;

Prepare detailed architectural and engineering plans and specifications for specific projects and works related to water resources and related land development, flooding, navigation, harbors, conservation, water quality and open space;

Arrange and cooperate with any city, county, state or supplier of utilities for the abandonment, relocation or other adjustment on roads, highways, bridges and utility lines and services;

Acquire by purchase or by gift all land or interest in land, including easements, rights-of-way and leasehold interests and facilities within the area needed for construction of water control structures, channel improvements and facilities for navigation, drainage, irrigation, water conservation and supply, recreation, fish and wildlife conservation and open space. The authority may hold, mortgage or otherwise encumber, sell, lease or sublease such land or interests in land or easements deemed to be in the public interest. During the time that title to such property is held in public ownership, it is exempt from all taxes levied by the state and all political subdivisions thereof; and all other property and activities of the authority are similarly exempt. The authority may lease or rent privileges in or upon any property under its control upon such terms and conditions as it deems to be in the public interest. All funds derived from the disposal by the authority of any interest in real property shall, notwithstanding § 12-2-112(a)(7), be deposited to a reserve account for the use and benefit of the Chickasaw basin authority. The funds in such account may be expended only after they have been appropriated and allotted in accordance with title 9, chapter 4;

Build, construct, operate, manage, lease and maintain all works, facilities and programs needed for water controls, channel improvements, navigation, drainage, irrigation, water conservation, water quality, water supply, recreation, fish and wildlife conservation and open space;

Fund jointly with the state the planning, acquisition of land and facilities, construction, operation, management and maintenance of all works, facilities and programs needed by the authority;

Fix, levy and collect fees, rents, tolls or other charges for the use of or in connection with any works or programs that are administered by the authority and with any bond issue that may be issued under this part; and

Develop reservoirs and shoreline lands for recreational use and provide for their operation.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 4; T.C.A., §66-1-204; Acts 1984, ch. 539, § 1; 2006, ch. 863, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 25, provided that the amendment by that act, which deleted former subdivision (15), shall apply only to eminent domain or condemnation proceedings initiated on or after July 1, 2006.

Cross-References. Power and use of eminent domain, title 29, ch. 17, part 1.

64-1-205. Financing.

The authority has the powers with respect to finance as follows:

The authority is an entity for purposes of general state obligation bond financing. The authority has the power to issue its bonds from time to time in consultation with the state. Any bond issue wherein the general obligation of the state is attached must first be approved by the general assembly and provision made for amortization of both principal and interest for a period not to exceed forty (40) years. The authority shall present to the general assembly its needs with regard to specific bond issues, together with evidence that the legislative bodies of the counties and municipalities have appropriated or issued bonds sufficient for matching purposes and its estimate of annual revenues to be received therefrom. Specific bond issues shall describe the purpose, land, works or improvements to be accomplished and their location;

The state is hereby authorized to match funds raised by such local governments for the purposes authorized under this part. The state is authorized to match funds raised by such local governments for authority purposes either through issuance of bonds or on pay-as-you-go basis, or a combination of the two (2), with the local governments providing their share of the costs through local appropriations of such funds by their respective legislative bodies. Bonds shall be issued in the usual manner that state bonds are authorized and sold after the approval of such bond issue by the general assembly;

In scheduling improvements, the authority shall make maximum use of federal grant funds from any federal program for which it is eligible;

The state is hereby authorized to match funds raised locally to provide for the operations of the authority, including costs of administration, planning, engineering, program development and administration, land acquisition, equipment and other capital improvements and bond financing and amortization;

Each city, town or county within the area is hereby authorized and empowered to contribute to the work of the authority any amount that each respective governing body, acting in its sole discretion, shall approve to be paid from the general fund of the respective city or county or shall issue its general obligation bonds for and on behalf of the authority;

By October 1 of each year, the authority shall transmit to the commissioner of environment and conservation an estimated budget with a request for an amount to be included in the governor's budget recommendations for the next fiscal year. Such budget shall include the estimated administrative, operation and maintenance expenses and shall include appropriate justification for such requested appropriation. Such amount, or other amount as deemed appropriate by the commissioner and approved by the governor, shall be included in the budget request transmitted to the general assembly; and

It is the intent of this part that the authority be operated as a state agency subject to all fiscal requirements and procedures that apply to other state departments and agencies and subject to joint local funding as stipulated in this part.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 5; T.C.A., §66-1-205.

64-1-206. Annual reports.

The board of directors of the authority shall report annually to the governing bodies of the various counties, cities and towns in the area and to the state. Such reports shall include, but not be limited to, statements of financial receipts and expenditures, a summary of activities and accomplishments for the period and proposed plans for the next year and for five (5) subsequent years.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 6; T.C.A., §66-1-206.

64-1-207. Pre-existing and independent projects.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as interfering with existing contracts or works of improvements currently under way by state and local governments or with works of improvements that are undertaken independently from the authority and the state, if such works are not in conflict with basin-wide plans for control of water, recreation and conservation.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 7; T.C.A., §66-1-207.

64-1-208. Local improvements.

Any one (1) county, individually, or in combination with one (1) or more counties, may undertake works of improvements as provided for in this part with the authority and the state, if such works are not in conflict with the basin-wide plans for control of water. A majority of the members of the board of directors representing such county wanting to act individually, together with the member at large, as provided for in §64-1-203(a)(2)(A)(iii), are sufficient to make all decisions and take action for the board with regard to works of improvements for such county.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 8; T.C.A., §66-1-208.

64-1-209. Local control and operation of improvements.

Upon the final acceptance from the contractor of any specific project on the Chickasaw basin plan, the governing body or bodies of the county or counties wherein the project is physically located may at their option require the authority to relinquish the control and operation of the project to the county; provided, that such county shall thereafter be fully responsible for the cost of maintenance and operation of such project and shall receive all revenues therefrom, except such revenues as might be pledged to the payment of obligations theretofore incurred by the authority.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 9; T.C.A., §66-1-209.

64-1-210. Cooperation with county soil conservation districts and conservation boards.

The authority shall develop its programs and plans for implementation in close cooperation with the existing county soil conservation districts as established under title 43, chapter 14, part 2 and county conservation boards as established by §§11-21-101 —11-21-109, so that such districts and boards are joint sponsors of individual projects or works of improvements as related to small watersheds in individual counties.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 10; T.C.A., §66-1-210.

64-1-211. Cooperation from state agencies.

All agencies of the state are hereby authorized and directed to extend their cooperation and to lend assistance to the authority in the formulation and implementation of a development program.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 12; T.C.A., §66-1-212.

64-1-212. County participation — Withdrawal.

This part applies to Shelby and Tipton counties for the purpose of implementing the programs established in this part, and any or all of these counties are hereby expressly authorized by the general assembly to participate in the programs established. However, prior to participation in such programs, the county legislative bodies of Shelby and Tipton counties shall express their desire to participate in the programs, by means of a resolution to that effect, passed by each or all of the respective local legislative bodies of the counties involved.

Any county to which this part applies that has elected or elects to participate in the programs authorized by this part may withdraw from participation in the programs by resolution to that effect adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of such county. However, such withdrawal shall not relieve such county of any of its then existing obligation on account of bonds or other evidence of indebtedness incurred by such county on account of its participation in the programs of the authority, and such obligation shall continue until discharged by the county.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 11; 1976, ch. 847, §§ 2, 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., §66-1-211.

64-1-213. Relation to existing laws — Liberal construction.

This part shall be considered supplemental and additional to any and all other laws and confers sufficient authority in and of itself for the purposes set forth in this part.

This part shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose of facilitating the development of the resources of the Chickasaw basin.

Acts 1973, ch. 409, § 13; T.C.A., §66-1-213.